Missouri, session 2026, SB1471.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.1250, to read as
follows:
537.1250. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may
be cited as the "Act Against Abusive Website Access
Litigation".
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Access violation", any allegation that a public
accommodation does not provide sufficient access under the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act or under state law
or any other similar allegation under state or federal law;
(b) "Public accommodation", the same term as described
in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000, et seq. For the purposes of this
section, the term "public accommodation" includes a website
operated by a resident of this state;
(c) "Resident of this state", any person residing in
this state and any entity that has filed with the secretary
of state under chapter 351.
2. (1) The attorney general, on behalf of a class of
residents of this state under section 507.070 who are

SB 1471 2
subject to litigation that alleges any website access
violation, and any resident of this state who is subject to
litigation that alleges any website access violation may
file a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction
within this state against the party, attorney, or law firm
that initiated such litigation for a determination as to
whether such litigation alleging a website access violation
is abusive litigation.
(2) In determining whether any litigation that alleges
any website access violation constitutes abusive litigation,
the trier of fact shall consider the totality of the
circumstances to determine if the primary purpose of the
litigation that alleges a website access violation is
obtaining a payment from a defendant due to the costs of
defending the action in court. For the purposes of making
this determination, the trier of fact may assess the
following factors and any other factors the trier of fact
deems relevant:
(a) The number of substantially similar actions filed
by the same plaintiff, lawyer, or law firm or any history of
such plaintiff, lawyer, or law firm in bringing frivolous
litigation or other litigation declared by a court to be
abusive litigation in the past ten years;
(b) The number of full-time employees employed by the
defendant and the resources available to the defendant to
engage in the litigation;
(c) The resources available to the defendant to
correct the alleged website access violation;
(d) Whether the jurisdiction or venue where the action
is brought is a substantial obstacle to defending against
the litigation;

SB 1471 3
(e) Whether the filing party or lawyer filing the
litigation is a resident of this state or is licensed to
practice law in this state;
(f) The nature of settlement discussions and the
reasonableness of settlement offers and refusals to settle.
The application of such settlement information shall be used
only as provided by this section and shall not otherwise
alter the rules of evidence applicable to such court; and
(g) Whether any factors under Missouri supreme court
rule 55.03(c) exist in the litigation and whether sanctions
are appropriate under Missouri supreme court rule 55.03(d).
(3) Except as provided further, if the defendant in
any litigation that alleges a website access violation in
good faith attempts to correct the alleged violation within
thirty days after being provided written notice or being
served a petition or complaint with sufficient detail to
identify and correct the alleged violation, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the subsequent initiation or
continuance of litigation that alleges a website access
violation constitutes abusive litigation. There shall not
be a rebuttable presumption that such litigation is abusive
litigation if the alleged website access violation is not
corrected, as determined by the court, within ninety days
after being provided written notice or being served a
petition or complaint with sufficient detail to identify and
correct the alleged violation. The trier of fact shall not
determine whether such litigation is abusive litigation
until after such ninety-day period expires or the alleged
violation is corrected, as determined by the court,
whichever occurs first.
3. If the attorney general determines in writing that
the litigation alleging a website access violation is not

SB 1471 4
abusive and such written determination is attached to the
petition in the litigation alleging a website access
violation, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such
litigation is not abusive.
4. If the trier of fact determines that an initiator
of an action under subsection 2 of this section is a
defendant in abusive litigation, the court may award
reasonable attorney's fees and costs in bringing the action
under subsection 2 of this section as well as defending
against the abusive litigation to be paid by the party
bringing the abusive litigation. In addition, the court may
award punitive damages or sanctions not to exceed three
times the amount of attorney's fees awarded by the court.
5. At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a
website access violation, the court shall review any
determination that such litigation is abusive and any award
of attorney's fees under the Missouri supreme court rules of
professional conduct to determine the reasonableness of the
award before issuing a judgment. The results obtained in
100 the litigation alleging a website access violation shall be
101 weighed heavily, particularly if the litigation was resolved
102 in favor of the plaintiff.
103 6. If the United States Department of Justice issues
104 standards concerning website accessibility under Title III
105 of the Americans with Disabilities Act, the attorney general
106 shall notify the revisor of statutes that such standards
107 have been issued. Upon receipt of such notification by the
108 revisor of statutes, the provisions of this section shall
109 expire.
✓